New York, session 2025-2026, S7952.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The transportation corporations law is amended by adding a 2 new section 125 to read as follows: 3 § 125. Sewage-works corporation liens. 1. If there shall be any 4 payments which are due to a sewage-works corporation in the town of 5 Tuxedo from a homeowner owning real property serviced by such sewage- 6 works corporation, which shall remain due and unpaid, in whole or in 7 part, for a period of one calendar year from the date of billing of the 8 first missed payment, the same shall constitute a default and a lien may 9 be placed on the property by the sewage-works corporation. Such lien 10 shall be enforced under article three of the lien law. Such lien shall 11 not have priority over any other security interest in the real property. 12 2. Liens under this section shall be filed and recorded with the 13 appropriate county municipal office handling such matters where the real 14 property is located. 15 3. The aggrieved party has one year from after the prescribed period 16 of one calendar year to file a notice of lien for unpaid services. With- 17 in ten days after filing of such notice the lienor shall service a copy 18 personally, or by mail, upon the person with whom the unpaid services 19 were provided to. 20 § 2. The lien law is amended by adding a new section 66 to read as 21 follows: 22 § 66. Enforcement of sewage-works corporation lien on real property. A 23 sewage-works corporation lien by a sewage-works corporation located EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07599-02-5 S. 7952 2 1 within the town of Tuxedo on real property may be enforced against such 2 property, and against a person liable for the debt upon which the lien 3 is founded, by an action, by the lienor, the lienor's assignee or legal 4 representative, in the supreme court or in a county court otherwise 5 having jurisdiction, regardless of the amount of such debt, so long as 6 the provisions in section one hundred twenty-five of the transportation 7 corporations law are met. 8 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately.